Hawaii statutes.
[§11-7] Elections commission. (a) There
is established an elections commission within the department of accounting and
general services for administrative purposes. The elections commission shall
consist of nine members who shall be selected as follows:

(1) The president of the senate shall select two
elections commission members;

(2) The speaker of the house of representatives shall
select two elections commission members;

(3) The senators belonging to a party or parties
different from the president of the senate shall designate one senator to
select two elections commission members;

(4) The representatives belonging to a party or
parties different from the speaker of the house of representatives shall
designate one representative to select two elections commission members; and

(5) One member, who shall serve as chairperson of the
elections commission, shall be selected by the members of the elections
commission selected pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4);

provided that each group of four elections commission
members selected by each house shall include one elections commission member
from each of the four counties.

(b) The chairperson of the elections
commission under subsection (a)(5) shall be selected by a two-thirds vote.

(c) A vacancy in the elections commission
shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment as specified in
subsection (a) within fifteen days. A vacancy in the elections commission
shall be filled with a person from the same county as the departing elections commission
member. Elections commission member vacancies not filled within the times
specified shall be filled promptly thereafter by the chief justice of the
supreme court.

(d) The elections commission shall act by
majority vote of its membership and shall establish its own procedures, except
as may be provided by law.

(e) Notwithstanding section 26-34, elections
commission member appointments shall not be subject to senatorial confirmation.

(f) The term of the elections commissioners
shall be four years, except that with respect to the terms of the initial
elections commission members, one member selected from each of subsection
(a)(1) to (4) shall serve for a term of two years.

(g) The elections commissioners shall serve
without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for reasonable expenses,
including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. [L
2004, c 57, pt of §6]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next